engdet.lexc
!!!engdet.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Det +Def +Indef +fwConsonant +fwVowel

LEXICON Root

Determiner ;

LEXICON Determiner

a[stem]+Det+Indef+fwConsonant:a #;
ain Det;
all Det;
an[stem]+Det+Indef+fwVowel:an #;
another Det;
any Det;
both Det;
certain Det;
each Det;
either Det;
else Det;
enough Det;
every Det;
few Det;
half Det;
many Det;
most Det;
much Det;
no Det;
other Det;
our Det;
own Det;
several Det;
some Det;
such Det;
sundry Det;
that Det;
the[stem]+Det+Def:the #;
these Det;
this Det;
those Det;
umpteen Det;
various Det;
what Det;
whatever Det;
wheen Det;
which Det;
whichever Det;
whose Det;
ye Det;
yond Det;
yonder Det;

LEXICON Det

[stem]+Det:0 #;
